Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 73. Social Services for Town Residents

§ 2691.
Aid to social services for town residents.

At a meeting duly warned for that purpose, a town or incorporated village may appropriate such sums of money as it deems necessary for the support of social service programs and facilities within that town for its residents. Social service programs, for which a town or incorporated village may appropriate sums of money, include: transportation, nutrition, medical, child care, and other rehabilitative services for persons with low incomes, elders, children, persons with disabilities, persons with a substance use disorder, and persons requiring employment to eliminate their need for public assistance. The authority herein granted is not in derogation of other local powers to allocate funds.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 56;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 152.

§ 2692.
Contract with service provider.

The legislative body of a municipality making an appropriation, as provided in section 2691 of this title, may make a contract with public or private agencies or persons concerning the provision of those certain social services.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2693.
Joint action by municipalities.

A municipality may secure the provision of social services jointly with adjacent municipalities if such joint action is warranted to provide more effective and efficient social services for its residents.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2694.
Establishment of homes.

A town may build, purchase, or lease home to provide housing for elders or persons entitled to receive aid and assistance under this title. It may purchase land and appropriate funds for those purposes.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 147

, § 42a, eff. Oct. 1, 1968;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 153.

§ 2695.
Administration of home.

In town meeting, a town which provides such home may appoint proper officers for the government of such home, and make necessary rules and regulations for governing such persons as are admitted thereto.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 147

, § 42b, eff. Oct. 1, 1968.

§ 2696.
Associated town home.

Any number of towns may unite for the purpose of supporting a town home. For this purpose, they may enter into an agreement under chapter 121 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 147

, § 42c, eff. Oct. 1, 1968;

2017, No. 74

, § 102.

Parties.

Third town had no interest in the event of a suit brought by the plaintiff town to recover of the defendant town the amount of an assessment paid to the association by the plaintiff for the support, upon this farm, of a pauper legally chargeable to the defendant. Town of Jericho v. Town of Underhill, 64 Vt. 362, 24 A. 251 (1892), same case 67 Vt. 85, 30 A. 690. (Decided under prior law.)